Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.080

Vocational agriculture education—Intent.

The legislature recognizes that agriculture is the most basic and singularly important industry in the state, that agriculture is of central importance to the welfare and economic stability of the state, and that the maintenance of this vital industry requires a continued source of trained and qualified individuals who qualify for employment in agriculture and agribusiness. The legislature declares that it is within the best interests of the people and state of Washington that a comprehensive vocational education program in agriculture be maintained in the state's secondary school system.

[ 1983 1st ex.s. c 34 s 1. Formerly RCW 28A.03.415.]